Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON INDUSTRIAL HEMP AGRICULTURAL
PILOT PROGRAM
SECTION 1. Sections 2 and 3 of this 2018 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 571.300
to 571.348.
SECTION 2. ORS 571.300 to 571.348 shall be known and may be cited as the  Oregon In-
dustrial Hemp Agricultural Pilot Program and Research Act.
SECTION 3. The State Department of Agriculture shall administer  an Oregon Industrial
Hemp Agricultural Pilot Program for the purpose of studying the growth,  cultivation and
marketing of industrial hemp in this state. In carrying out the program, the department:
(1) Shall administer ORS 571.300 to 571.348;
(2) Shall adopt by rule any record  keeping and reporting requirements necessary to ad-
minister the program;
(3) May purchase, possess, seize or dispose of  industrial hemp products or commodities
as the department deems necessary to enforce and ensure compliance with ORS  571.300 to
571.348 or department rules relating to ORS 571.300 to 571.348; and
(4) May exercise any other power  or perform any other function necessary to administer
the program.
SECTION 4.
Section 3 of this 2018  Act is intended to name the State Department of Ag-
riculture hemp research  program operating immediately prior to the effective date of this
2018 Act the Oregon Industrial Hemp  Agricultural Pilot Program. The Oregon Industrial
Hemp Agricultural Pilot Program is a continuation of the hemp research  program operating
immediately prior to the effective date of this 2018 Act and  not a new program. Any refer-
ences in any statutory or uncodified law or resolution of the Legislative Assembly, or in a
rule, document, record or proceeding authorized by the  Legislative Assembly, to the hemp
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 1
research program operated by  the department immediately prior to the effective date of this
2018 Act are considered  to be references to the Oregon Industrial Hemp Agricultural Pilot
Program.
SECTION 5. Section 4 of this 2018 Act is repealed January 2, 2019.
AGRICULTURAL HEMP SEED CERTIFICATE PROGRAM
SECTION 6. Section 7 of  this 2018 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 571.300 to
571.348.
SECTION 7. (1) For purposes of ORS 633.511 to 633.750,  agricultural hemp seed is an ag-
ricultural seed or a flower seed, as those terms are defined in ORS 633.511.
(2) The Director of Agriculture, or the director’s agent, and the  Dean of the College of
Agricultural Sciences of Oregon State University, or the dean’s  agent, shall establish a pro-
gram for the labeling and certification of agricultural hemp seed. For purposes of the pro-
gram:
(a) The director and the dean shall perform their respective duties under ORS 633.511  to
633.750 with respect to  agricultural hemp seed in the same manner that the director and
dean perform their respective duties under ORS 633.511 to 633.750 with respect to  other ag-
ricultural seed  or flower seed, including but not limited to those duties related to labeling,
testing and certifying seeds; and
(b) The director and the dean shall exercise their respective functions and powers under
ORS 633.511 to 633.750 with respect to agricultural hemp seed in the same manner that the
director and dean exercise their  respective functions and powers under ORS 633.511 to
633.750 with respect to other agricultural seed or flower seed,  including but not limited to
inspecting and sampling seeds and making rules and regulations under ORS 633.680.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, if  the director in consultation
with the dean determines that a  specific provision of ORS 633.511 to 633.750, or a specific rule
or regulation made  under ORS 633.511 to 633.750, that applies to other agricultural seed or
flower seed is inadequate or not suitable for the regulation  of agricultural hemp seed, the
director may by rule exempt agricultural hemp seed from the provision, rule or regulation
and make rules providing more adequate or suitable regulation of agricultural hemp seed.
(4)(a) The director and the dean shall  collaborate with growers registered under ORS
571.305 in performing their respective duties and  exercising their respective functions and
powers under ORS 633.511 to 633.750 with respect to agricultural hemp seed.
(b) The director and the dean may collaborate with growers  registered under ORS 571.305
and other stakeholders to develop a heritage agricultural hemp seed for this state.
(5) The director and the dean  may collaborate with entities authorized to certify seeds
under the laws of other states in performing their respective duties and exercising  their re-
spective functions and powers under  ORS 633.511 to 633.750 with respect to agricultural hemp
seed.
(6) A  grower registered under ORS 571.305 is not required, for purposes related to grow-
ing industrial hemp, to use an  agricultural hemp seed variety certified under the program
described in this section.
(7) The  State Department of Agriculture may establish by rule waivers to, or exemptions
from, tests  that would otherwise be conducted to determine a crop’s average
tetrahydrocannabinol concentration for crops planted  with agricultural hemp seed varieties
certified pursuant to the program described in this section.
INDUSTRIAL HEMP TESTING
SECTION 8.
Sections 9 and 10 of this 2018 Act are added to and  made a part of ORS
571.300 to 571.348.
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 2
SECTION 9. The State Department  of Agriculture may by rule or order establish a
process providing for the remediation of a violation  of ORS 571.330 or 571.333 that is com-
mitted by a grower or handler registered under ORS 571.305 and is not committed  inten-
tionally.
SECTION 10. The State Department of  Agriculture may charge growers and handlers
registered under ORS  571.305 fees reasonably calculated by the department to pay the cost
of sampling or testing industrial hemp or  industrial hemp commodities or products under
ORS 571.330 and 571.333. Moneys from fees charged  under this section shall be deposited in
the Industrial Hemp Fund established under section 30 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 11.  ORS 571.330 is amended to read:
571.330. (1) For purposes  of this section, “consumption” means to ingest, inhale or topically ap-
ply to the skin or hair.
[(2)] (2)(a) A laboratory licensed by the Oregon  Liquor Control Commission under ORS 475B.560
and accredited by the Oregon Health Authority  pursuant to ORS 475B.565 may test industrial hemp
and industrial hemp commodities and products produced or processed by a grower, handler or  agri-
cultural hemp seed producer registered under ORS 571.305.
(b) An accredited independent testing laboratory that has been  approved by the authority
or the State Department of Agriculture may  test industrial hemp and industrial hemp com-
modities and products produced or processed by a grower, handler or agricultural hemp seed
producer registered under ORS 571.305.
(3) A [ handler registered under ORS  571.305] grower or handler  may not sell or transfer  an
industrial hemp commodity or product  that is intended for human consumption unless the commodity
or product  is tested by a laboratory described in subsection (2) of this section to ensure that the
commodity or product meets the requirements adopted  by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
475B.555 (1)(a) and (b) and (2) for testing marijuana items.
(4) For purposes of this section, the [ State Department of  Agriculture ] department  shall adopt
rules:
(a) Establishing protocols for the testing of industrial hemp commodities and products; and
(b) Establishing  procedures for determining batch sizes and for sampling industrial hemp com-
modities and products.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) Agricultural hemp seed;
(b) Seeds of the plant genus Cannabis within the plant  family Cannabaceae that are in-
capable of germination;
(c) Products derived from seeds described in paragraph (b) of this subsection; or
(d) Other parts of industrial hemp that the department identifies by rule as exempt.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 571.333 is amended to read:
571.333. (1) The State Department of Agriculture may enter into an agreement with  the Oregon
Health Authority for the purpose of developing  standards for investigating and testing an industrial
hemp crop to  [ ensure that the crop contains an ] determine the  average tetrahydrocannabinol con-
centration [ that does not exceed 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis ] of the crop .
(2) In accordance  with standards developed under subsection (1) of this section, a laboratory
[licensed by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission under ORS  475B.560 and accredited by the au-
thority pursuant to ORS 475B.565 ] described in ORS 571.330 may test an  industrial hemp crop for
the purpose  of determining the average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of the crop. The labo-
ratory must provide the  test results to the department in a form and manner prescribed by
the department.
[(3) A laboratory described in subsection (2) of this section must provide the test results to the de-
partment in a form and manner prescribed by the department. ]
INDUSTRIAL HEMP COMMODITIES OR PRODUCTS
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 3
SECTION 13. Sections 14, 15 and 15a of this 2018 Act  are added to and made a part of
ORS 571.300 to 571.348.
SECTION 14. (1) The  Oregon Liquor Control Commission may purchase, possess, seize
or dispose of industrial hemp products or commodities located on a  premises licensed under
ORS 475B.070, 475B.090, 475B.100, 475B.105 or 475B.560 or other area under the control of the
premises licensee as the commission deems necessary to enforce  and ensure compliance
with:
(a) ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, 475B.550 to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to 475B.655 or rules adopted
by the commission relating  to ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, 475B.550 to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to
475B.655; or
(b) Any provision  in ORS 571.300 to 571.348 or in rules adopted by the commission or
State Department of Agriculture under  ORS 571.300 to 571.348 that makes a requirement,
restriction or other provision of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, 475B.550  to 475B.590 or 475B.600
to 475B.655 applicable to industrial hemp.
(2) If  the commission purchases, possesses, seizes or disposes of industrial hemp pro-
ducts or commodities under this section to enforce or ensure  compliance with a provision
of ORS 571.300 to  571.348 or rule adopted by the department under ORS 571.300 to 571.348 that
makes a requirement, restriction or other provision of ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,  475B.550
to 475B.590 or 475B.600 to 475B.655 applicable to industrial hemp, the commission shall notify
the department of the commission action as soon as practicable.
SECTION 15.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consumption” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.330.
(b) “Processor” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.090.
(c) “Retailer” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.105.
(d) “Wholesaler” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.100.
(2) Except as provided in section 15a of this 2018 Act, a processor, retailer  or wholesaler
may purchase, receive, transfer,  sell or transport industrial hemp, or an industrial hemp
commodity or product that contains cannabinoids and is intended  for human consumption,
only if:
(a) The  processor, retailer or wholesaler received the hemp, commodity or product from
a grower or handler registered under ORS 571.305 or a processor;
(b) The grower, handler  or processor under paragraph (a) of this subsection is registered
by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission as provided under ORS 571.336; and
(c) The hemp, commodity or product meets the requirements for marijuana items under
ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, 475B.550 to 475B.590 and 475B.600  to 475B.655 and rules adopted by
the commission.
(3) A grower, handler or processor registered as described under ORS 571.336  (2)(a) shall
enter hemp,  commodity or product that contains cannabinoids, is intended for human con-
sumption and is intended for transfer, sale or transport to a processor, retailer or wholesaler
licensed under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545 into the tracking system described in ORS 475B.177
before the hemp, commodity or product is transferred  to a laboratory described in ORS
571.330 (2) for testing of a type described under  ORS 475B.555. The commission shall continue
to track the hemp, commodity or product  entered into the system under this subsection
when the hemp, commodity or product is transferred, sold  or transported to a premises li-
censed under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, or to other areas under  the control of the premises
licensee.
(4) The State Department of  Agriculture shall adopt rules regarding the activities of
growers and handlers under this section.
(5) The commission shall adopt rules regarding the activities of processors, retailers,
wholesalers and laboratories under this section.
SECTION 15a.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Consumer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475B.015.
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 4
(b) “Retailer” means a person licensed under ORS 475B.105.
(2) Industrial hemp products that contain more  than 0.3 percent tetrahydrocannabinol
may not be sold to a consumer by a person other than a retailer.
(3) The Oregon Liquor Control Commission shall adopt rules establishing  measures the
commission deems necessary for ensuring compliance with this section.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 571.339 is amended to read:
571.339. A person may not make a retail sale of industrial hemp commodities or products in this
state unless the industrial hemp commodities or products and the  industrial hemp used to process
the industrial hemp commodities or products meet the [ same or substantially the same ] requirements
for processing industrial hemp commodities or products or growing industrial hemp set  forth in ORS
571.300 to 571.348 and rules adopted under ORS 571.300 to 571.348. This  section does not apply to
the retail sale  of industrial hemp commodities or products by a marijuana retailer, as defined in ORS
475B.015, that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105.
NOTE: Sections 17 and  18 were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renum-
bered.
PERSONAL POSSESSION
SECTION 19. Section 20 of this 2018 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 571.300 to
571.348.
SECTION 20. (1) ORS 571.300 to 571.348 do not apply to the production or storage  of
homegrown plants in the genus Cannabis within  the plant family Cannabaceae at a household
by one  or more persons 21 years of age or older, if the total amount of homegrown plants
at the household does not exceed four plants at any time.
(2) As used in this section, “homegrown” and “household”  have the meanings given those
terms in ORS 475B.015.
SECTION 21.  ORS 475B.301 is amended to read:
475B.301. ORS 475B.025, 475B.030, 475B.033, 475B.035,  475B.040, 475B.045, 475B.050, 475B.055,
475B.060, 475B.063, 475B.065, 475B.068, 475B.070, 475B.085,  475B.090, 475B.100, 475B.105, 475B.115,
475B.119, 475B.136, 475B.139, 475B.144, 475B.146,  475B.154, 475B.158, 475B.163, 475B.173, 475B.177,
475B.206, 475B.211, 475B.216, 475B.224, 475B.232, 475B.236,  475B.241, 475B.246, 475B.256, 475B.261,
475B.266, 475B.276, 475B.281, 475B.286, 475B.296,  475B.461, 475B.474, 475B.479, 475B.486, 475B.491,
475B.501, 475B.506, 475B.514, 475B.518, 475B.521, 475B.523, 475B.526 and 475B.529 do not apply:
(1) To the production or storage of homegrown [ marijuana] plants in the  genus Cannabis
within the plant family Cannabaceae  that are otherwise subject to ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545
at a household by one or more persons  21 years of age and older, if the total amount of homegrown
[marijuana] plants at the household does not exceed four [ marijuana] plants at any time.
(2) To the possession or  storage of usable marijuana items at a household by one or more per-
sons 21 years of age or older, if the total  amount of usable marijuana at the household does not
exceed eight ounces of usable marijuana at any time.
(3) To the making, processing, possession or storage of cannabinoid products at a  household by
one or more persons 21 years of age and older, if the total amount of cannabinoid products at  the
household does not exceed 16 ounces in solid form at any time.
(4) To the making, processing, possession or storage of cannabinoid products at a  household by
one or more persons 21 years of age and older, if the total amount of cannabinoid products at  the
household does not exceed 72 ounces in liquid form at any time.
(5) To  the making, processing, possession or storage of cannabinoid concentrates at a household
by one or more  persons 21 years of age or older, if the total amount of cannabinoid concentrates
at the household does not exceed 16 ounces at any time.
(6) To the possession of cannabinoid  extracts at a household by one or more persons 21 years
of age  or older, if the cannabinoid extracts were purchased from a marijuana retailer that holds a
license under ORS 475B.105, or transferred by a medical marijuana  dispensary registered by the
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 5
Oregon Health Authority under ORS 475B.858, and the total amount of cannabinoid extracts  at the
household does not exceed one ounce at any time.
(7) To the delivery of not more than one ounce of usable marijuana at a time by  a person 21
years of age or older to another person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial purposes.
(8) To the delivery of not more than 16 ounces of  cannabinoid products in solid form at a time
by a person 21 years  of age or older to another person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial
purposes.
(9) To the delivery of not more than 72 ounces of cannabinoid products  in liquid form at a time
by a person 21 years of age or older to another person 21 years of age  or older for noncommercial
purposes.
(10) To the delivery of  not more than 16 ounces of cannabinoid concentrates at a time by a
person 21 years of age or older to  another person 21 years of age or older for noncommercial pur-
poses.
SECTION 22.  ORS 475B.311 is amended to read:
475B.311. (1) A  person other than a marijuana processor that holds a license issued under ORS
475B.090 may not process cannabinoid extracts into a cannabinoid product.
(2) A person may not produce, process or store homemade industrial hemp extracts.
[(2)] (3) Violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 23.  ORS 475B.337 is amended to read:
475B.337. (1) Except for  licensees and licensee representatives acting in accordance with ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545 and any rule adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, it is unlawful for  any
person 21 years of age or older to possess, knowingly or intentionally:
(a) An amount  of [ marijuana] plants in the genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae in excess of the amount allowed under ORS 475B.301 (1).
(b) More than one ounce of usable marijuana in a public place.
(c) More than eight ounces of usable marijuana.
(d) More than 16 ounces of cannabinoid products in solid form or cannabinoid concentrates.
(e) More than 72 ounces of cannabinoid products in liquid form.
(f) More than one ounce of cannabinoid extracts.
(g) A  cannabinoid extract that was not purchased from a marijuana retailer that holds a license
issued under ORS 475B.105.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, unlawful  possession of a marijuana item
is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Unlawful possession of a marijuana item is:
(a) A Class B violation, if the amount possessed  is not more than two times the applicable
maximum amount specified in subsection (1)(a) to (f) of this section.
(b) A Class B misdemeanor, if the amount possessed is more than two times, but not more  than
four times, the applicable maximum amount specified in subsection (1)(a) to (f) of this section.
(c) A Class C felony, if the amount possessed is:
(A) More than 16 times the applicable maximum amount specified in subsection (1)(a), (c),  (d),
(e) or (f) of this subsection;
(B) More than eight pounds of usable marijuana in a public place; or
(C) More than one-quarter ounce of cannabinoid extract that was not purchased from a
marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 475B.341 is amended to read:
475B.341. (1) Except for  licensees and licensee representatives acting in accordance with ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545 and any rule adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545, it is unlawful for  any
person under 21 years of age to possess, knowingly or intentionally:
(a) An amount  of [ marijuana] plants in the genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae in excess of the amount allowed under ORS 475B.301 (1).
(b) More than one ounce of usable marijuana in a public place.
(c) More than eight ounces of usable marijuana.
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 6
(d) More than 16 ounces of cannabinoid products in solid form or cannabinoid concentrates.
(e) More than 72 ounces of cannabinoid products in liquid form.
(f) More than one ounce of cannabinoid extracts.
(g) A  cannabinoid extract that was not purchased from a marijuana retailer that holds a license
under ORS 475B.105.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, unlawful  possession of a marijuana item
by a person under 21 years of age is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Unlawful possession  of a marijuana item by a person under 21 years of age is a Class C
felony, if the amount possessed is:
(a) More than  16 times the applicable maximum amount specified in subsection (1)(a), (c), (d), (e)
or (f) of this subsection;
(b) More than eight pounds of usable marijuana in a public place; or
(c) More than one-quarter ounce of cannabinoid extract  that was not purchased from a
marijuana retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475B.105.
SECTION 25.
 ORS 475B.349 is amended to read:
475B.349. (1) Except for licensees and licensee representatives acting in  accordance with ORS
475B.010 to 475B.545 and any rule adopted under ORS 475B.010 to 475B.545,  and except for a person
acting within the scope of  and in compliance with ORS 475B.301, it is unlawful for any person to
manufacture a marijuana item.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, unlawful manufacture of a  marijuana
item is a Class A misdemeanor.
(3) Unlawful manufacture of a marijuana item is:
(a) A Class B misdemeanor, if a person 21 years of  age or older unlawfully manufactures
homegrown marijuana at a household and the  total number of homegrown [ marijuana] plants in the
genus Cannabis within the plant family Cannabaceae at the household exceeds four [ marijuana]
plants but does not exceed eight [ marijuana] plants.
(b) A Class C felony, if:
(A) A person unlawfully manufactures marijuana  and the total number of [ marijuana] plants in
the genus Cannabis within the plant family Cannabaceae exceeds 12 [ marijuana] plants; or
(B) A person unlawfully manufactures  a cannabinoid product or a cannabinoid concentrate and
the total amount of  cannabinoid products or the total amount of cannabinoid concentrates exceeds
twice the applicable maximum amount specified in ORS 475B.337 (1)(d), (e) or (f).
(c) A Class B felony, if a person unlawfully manufactures a cannabinoid extract.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 475B.831 is amended to read:
475B.831. (1)(a) A registry identification cardholder  and the designated primary caregiver of the
registry identification cardholder may jointly possess:
(A) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants; and
(B) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants.
(b)(A) Unless an address is the marijuana grow site  of a person designated to produce marijuana
by a  registry identification cardholder, the address where a registry identification cardholder or the
primary caregiver of  a registry identification cardholder produces marijuana may be used to produce
not more than:
(i) Six or fewer mature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder, up to 12  mature
marijuana plants; and
(ii) Twelve or fewer immature marijuana plants per registry identification cardholder,  up to 24
immature marijuana plants.
(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, an address that  is subject to this
paragraph may not be used to  produce [ marijuana] plants in the genus Cannabis within the plant
family Cannabaceae pursuant to ORS 475B.301.
(C) Subject to subparagraph (D) of this paragraph, an  address that is subject to this paragraph
may be used  to produce [ marijuana] plants in the genus Cannabis within the plant family
Cannabaceae pursuant to ORS 475B.301 if a person other  than a registry identification cardholder
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 7
who is using the  address to produce marijuana plants pursuant to ORS 475B.785 to 475B.949 resides
at the address.
(D) An address that is subject to  this paragraph may not be used to produce more than 12 total
mature marijuana plants.
(2)(a) A  person may be designated to produce marijuana under ORS 475B.810 by no more than
four registry identification cardholders.
(b) A person who is designated to produce marijuana  by a registry identification cardholder may
produce no more than six mature marijuana plants and  no more than 12 immature marijuana plants
that are 24 inches or more  in height for a registry identification cardholder who designates the
person to produce marijuana.
(3) If the address of a  person responsible for a marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810 is lo-
cated within city limits in an area zoned for residential use:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, no more than 12 mature marijuana
plants and no more than 24 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in  height may
be produced at the address; or
(b) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, if each person responsible for a marijuana grow site
located at the address first registered with the Oregon Health Authority under  ORS 475B.810 before
January 1, 2015:
(A) No more than the amount of mature marijuana plants located at  that address on December
31, 2014, in excess of 12 mature marijuana plants, not to  exceed 24 mature marijuana plants, may
be produced at the address; and
(B) No more than 48  immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height may be
produced at the address.
(4) If the address of a  person responsible for a marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810 is lo-
cated in an area other than an area described in subsection (3) of this section:
(a) Except as provided in paragraph  (b) of this subsection, no more than 48 mature marijuana
plants and no more than 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in  height may
be produced at the address; or
(b) Subject to subsections (5) and (6) of this section, if  each person responsible for a marijuana
grow site located at the address first registered with the authority under ORS 475B.810 before
January 1, 2015:
(A) No more than the amount of mature marijuana plants located at  that address on December
31, 2014, in excess of 48 mature marijuana plants, not to  exceed 96 mature marijuana plants, may
be produced at the address; and
(B) No more than  192 immature marijuana plants that are 24 inches or more in height may be
produced at the address.
(5) If the authority suspends or  revokes the registration of a person responsible for a marijuana
grow site that is located at an address described in subsection (3)(b) or (4)(b) of this section:
(a) No more than 12 mature marijuana plants and no more than 24 immature  marijuana plants
that are 24 inches or more in height may be subsequently produced  at any address described in
subsection (3) of this section at which the person  responsible for that marijuana grow site produces
marijuana.
(b) No more than 48 mature marijuana plants and no more than 96 immature  marijuana plants
that are 24 or more inches in height may be subsequently produced  at any address described in
subsection (4) of this section at which the person  responsible for that marijuana grow site produces
marijuana.
(6) If a registry identification cardholder who designated a person to  produce marijuana for the
registry identification cardholder pursuant to ORS 475B.810 terminates the designation, the  person
responsible for the marijuana grow site whose designation has been terminated may not be desig-
nated to produce marijuana by another  registry identification cardholder, except that the person
may be  designated by another registry identification cardholder if no more than 48 mature
marijuana plants  and no more than 96 immature marijuana plants that are 24 or more inches in
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 8
height are produced at  the address for the marijuana grow site at which the person produces
marijuana.
(7) Subject to the limits described in subsections (2)  to (6) of this section, if multiple persons
responsible for a  marijuana grow site under ORS 475B.810 are located at the same address, the
persons designated to produce marijuana by registry  identification cardholders who are located at
that address may collectively  produce marijuana plants for any number of registry identification
cardholders who designate the persons to produce marijuana.
(8) If a law enforcement officer determines that there is a number of marijuana plants at  an
address in excess of the quantities specified  in this section, or that an address is being used to
produce a number of marijuana  plants in excess of the quantities specified in subsection (1)(b) of this
section, the law enforcement officer may confiscate only the excess number of marijuana plants.
TETRAHYDROCANNABINOL CONCENTRATION
SECTION 27.  ORS 571.300 is amended to read:
571.300. As used in ORS 571.300 to 571.348:
(1) “Agricultural hemp seed” means Cannabis seed:
(a) That is sold to or intended to be sold to registered growers for planting; or
(b) That remains in an unprocessed or partially processed condition that  is capable of
germination.
(2) “Crop” means industrial hemp grown under a single registration.
(3) “Grower” means a person, joint venture or cooperative that produces industrial hemp.
(4) “Handler” means a person, joint venture or cooperative that receives industrial  hemp for
processing into commodities, products or agricultural hemp seed.
(5) “Industrial hemp”:
(a) Except as provided in this paragraph,  means all nonseed parts and varieties of  the
Cannabis plant, whether growing  or not, that contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol concen-
tration that does not  exceed 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis. The State Department of Agri-
culture, by rule, may adopt any higher  average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration limit
established in federal law.
(b) Means any Cannabis seed:
(A) That is part of a crop;
(B) That is retained by a grower for future planting;
(C) That is agricultural hemp seed;
(D) That is for processing into or for use as agricultural hemp seed; or
(E) That has been processed in a manner or to an extent that  the Cannabis seed is incapable
of germination.
(c) Does not mean industrial hemp commodities or products.
(6) “Industrial hemp concentrate” means an industrial hemp product obtained by  separating
cannabinoids from industrial hemp by:
(a) A mechanical process;
(b) A  chemical extraction process using a nonhydrocarbon-based solvent, such as water, vege-
table glycerin, vegetable oils, animal fats, isopropyl alcohol or ethanol;
(c) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, provided that  the process does not in-
volve the use of high heat or pressure; or
(d) Any other process identified by the [ State] department [ of Agriculture ] by rule.
(7) “Industrial hemp extract”  means an industrial hemp product obtained by separating
cannabinoids from industrial hemp by:
(a) A  chemical extraction process using a hydrocarbon-based solvent, such as butane, hexane
or propane;
(b) A chemical extraction process using carbon dioxide, if the process uses high heat  or pres-
sure; or
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 9
(c) Any other process identified by the department by rule.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 571.305 is amended to read:
571.305. (1) To grow or handle industrial hemp, a  person must be registered with the State De-
partment of Agriculture as a grower or handler.
(2)(a) Only a grower or handler registered under this section may produce agricultural hemp
seed. For a  grower or handler to produce agricultural hemp seed, the grower or handler must be
registered with the department as an agricultural hemp seed producer.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A grower registered under this section that  retains agricultural hemp seed [ as described in
ORS 571.324] for the purpose of personally propagating industrial hemp in a subsequent year
is not required to register with the department as an agricultural hemp seed producer; and
(B) A grower or handler  registered under this section that produces Cannabis seeds that are
incapable of germination, or a handler registered under this section that processes Cannabis  seeds
that are incapable of germination into commodities or products, is  not required to register with the
department as an agricultural hemp seed producer.
(3) An applicant for registration under this section must  submit to the department, in a form
and manner prescribed by the department, the following information:
(a) The name and address of the applicant;
(b) The name and address of the industrial hemp operation of the applicant; and
(c) Any other information required by the department by rule.
(4) Registration  under this section is valid for a one-year term, beginning on January 1. A
grower, handler or agricultural hemp seed producer may renew a registration under this  section in
a form and manner prescribed by the department.
(5) A registration under this section is a personal privilege and is not transferable.
(6) A grower or handler  registered under this section must keep records as required by the de-
partment by rule. Upon not less than three days’ notice, the department may  subject the records to
inspection or audit during normal business hours. The department may make an  inspection or audit
for the purpose of ensuring compliance with:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to a  provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348 or a
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348.
(7) In addition to any inspection conducted pursuant to ORS 561.275, the department may inspect
any crop during the crop’s growth phase and take a representative composite sample for field anal-
ysis. If a crop  contains an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration exceeding 0.3 percent on a
dry weight basis or a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration exceeding the concentration allowed
under federal law, whichever is  greater , the department may detain, seize or embargo the crop
as provided under ORS 561.605 to 561.620 , subject to  any process established under section 9
of this 2018 Act .
(8) The department may charge growers, handlers and  agricultural hemp seed producers appli-
cation  fees , registration and renewal of registration fees , administrative change  fees and fees for
other services in amounts  reasonably calculated by the department to pay  the cost of adminis-
tering ORS 571.300 to  571.348. Moneys from fees charged under this subsection shall be deposited
in the [ Department of Agriculture Service Fund and are continuously appropriated to the  department
for purposes of carrying out the duties of the department  under ORS 571.300 to 571.348. ] Industrial
Hemp Fund established under section 30 of this 2018 Act.
(9) The department may adopt rules establishing public health and safety standards  and
industry best practices for growers and handlers registered under this section.
INDUSTRIAL HEMP FUND
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 10
SECTION 29. Section 30 of this 2018 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 571.300 to
571.348.
SECTION 30. There is established in the State Treasury, separate and distinct  from the
General Fund, the Industrial Hemp  Fund. Interest earned by the fund shall be credited to
the fund. The fund shall consist of  all moneys credited to or deposited in the fund. Moneys
in the fund are continuously appropriated to the State Department  of Agriculture for the
purposes of implementing, administering and enforcing ORS 571.300 to 571.348.
SECTION 31.  ORS 571.348 is amended to read:
571.348. (1) Subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 183, the State Department of Agriculture
may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $2,500 on a [ grower,  handler or agricultural hemp seed
producer] person for violating:
(a) A provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348;
(b) A rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348; or
(c) An order issued by the department pursuant to  a provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348 or a
rule adopted under a provision of ORS 571.300 to 571.348.
(2) The department may not discipline a [ grower, handler or agricultural hemp seed  producer ]
person under this section on the basis that possessing, delivering and manufacturing industrial
hemp are prohibited by federal law.
(3) All moneys collected by the department under this section shall be  deposited in the General
Fund in the State Treasury to the  credit of the [ Department of Agriculture Account. All moneys de-
posited in the account pursuant to this section are continuously appropriated to the  department for the
purpose of administering ORS 571.300 to 571.348. ] Industrial Hemp Fund established under sec-
tion 30 of this 2018 Act.
REPEAL
SECTION 32.
ORS 571.324 is repealed.
FISCAL PROVISIONS
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (2), chapter 578, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor Control Commission, for marijuana  regu-
lation, is increased by $284,856 for expenses related to the regulation of hemp.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 34. The unit captions used in this 2018 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY
SECTION 35. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 11
Passed by House March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4089 (HB 4089-B) Page 12